Utah statutes.
53-10-602.   Committee's duties and powers.

(1)  The committee shall:

(a)  review and make recommendations to the division, the Bureau of Communications, public safety answering points, and the Legislature on:

(i)  technical, administrative, fiscal, and operational issues for the implementation of a unified statewide wireless and land-based E-911 emergency system;

(ii)  specific technology and standards for the implementation of a unified statewide wireless and land-based E-911 emergency system;

(iii)  emerging technological upgrades;

(iv)  expenditures by local public service answering points to assure implementation of a unified statewide wireless and land-based E-911 emergency system and standards of operation; and

(v)  mapping systems and technology necessary to implement the unified statewide wireless and land-based E-911 emergency system;

(b)  administer the Statewide Unified E-911 Emergency Service Account as provided in this part;

(c)  assist as many local entities as possible, at their request, to implement the recommendations of the committee; and

(d)  fulfill all other duties imposed on the committee by the Legislature by this part.

(2)  The committee may sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of equipment or personal property belonging to the committee, the proceeds from which shall return to the restricted account.

(3) (a)  The committee shall review information regarding:

(i)  in aggregate, the number of telecommunication service subscribers by telecommunication service type in a political subdivision;

(ii)  911 call delivery network costs;

(iii)  public safety answering point costs; and

(iv)  system engineering information.

(b)  In accordance with Subsection (3)(a) the committee may request:

(i)  information as described in Subsection (3)(a)(i) from the Utah State Tax Commission; and

(ii)  information from public safety answering points connected to the 911 call delivery system.

(c)  The information requested by and provided to the committee under Subsection (3) is a protected record in accordance with Section 63G-2-305.

(4)  The committee shall issue the reimbursement allowed under Subsection 53-10-605(1)(b) provided that:

(a)  the reimbursement is based on aggregated cost studies submitted to the committee by the wireless carriers seeking reimbursement; and

(b)  the reimbursement to any one carrier does not exceed 125% of the wireless carrier's contribution to the restricted account.

(5)  The committee shall adopt rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to administer the restricted account created in Section 53-10-603 including rules that establish the criteria, standards, technology, and equipment that a local entity or state agency must adopt in order to qualify for grants from the restricted account.

(6)  The committee may employ an outside consultant to study and advise on the issue of public safety answering points.

(7)  This section does not expand the authority of the Utah State Tax Commission to request additional information from a telecommunication service provider.



Amended by Chapter 278, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 307, 2010 General Session

